gl_ES.dic
alborecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:alborécer
amortecer/310,311,312,410,411,412 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG t i al:amortécer
apracer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:aprácer
arrecender/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i recender=> al:arrecénder
arrequecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:arrequécer
atraer/310,311,312,410,411,412 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG t i al:atráer
bater/310,311,312,410,411,412,510,511,512 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG t i pr al:báter
ceder/310,311,312,410,411,412 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG t i al:céder
comer/310,311,312,410,411,412 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG t i al:cómer
condescender/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:condescénder
convalecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:convalécer
crecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:crécer
decorrer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:decórrer
decrecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:decrécer
deprender/310,311,312,410,411,412 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG t i al:deprénder
desadormecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:desadormécer
descender/310,311,312,410,411,412 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG t i al:descénder
desencoller/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:desencóller
desenrouquecer/310,311,312,410,411,412 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG t i al:desenrouquécer
desensoberbecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:desensoberbécer
desentumecer/310,311,312,410,411,412,510,511,512 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG t i pr al:desentumécer
desesmorecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:desesmorécer
desmerecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:desmerécer
despracer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:desprácer
discorrer/310,311,312,410,411,412 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG t i al:discórrer
doer/410,411,412,510,511,512 po:verbo is:intransitiva / pronominal VOLG i pr al:dóer
embranquecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:embranquécer
empardecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:empardécer
encanecer/310,311,312,410,411,412 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG t i al:encanécer
encher/310,311,312,410,411,412,510,511,512 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG t i pr al:éncher
engrandecer/310,311,312,410,411,412,510,511,512 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG t i pr al:engrandécer
enlouquecer/310,311,312,410,411,412 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG t i al:enlouquécer
ennegrecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:ennegrécer
enriquecer/310,311,312,410,411,412,510,511,512 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG t i pr al:enriquécer
entebrecer/310,311,312,410,411,412,510,511,512 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG t i pr al:entebrécer
entolecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:entolécer
escorrer/310,311,312,410,411,412 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG t i al:escórrer
esgarecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:esgarécer
estremecer/310,311,312,410,411,412 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG t i al:estremécer
falecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:falécer
foder/310,311,312,410,411,412,510,511,512 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG t pr i al:fóder
interceder/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:intercéder
marelecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:marelécer
obedecer/310,311,312,410,411,412 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG t i al:obedécer
pender/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:pénder
permanecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:permanécer
prender/310,311,312,410,411,412 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG t i al:prénder
proer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:próer
quencer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i quecer=> al:quéncer
recender/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:recénder
remanecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:remanécer
remorder/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:remórder
requecer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:requécer
retremer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:retrémer
rexer/310,311,312,410,411,412,510,511,512 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG t pr i al:réxer
romper/310,311,312,410,411,412 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva VOLG t i al:rómper
torcer/310,311,312,410,411,412,510,511,512 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal VOLG t i pr al:tórcer
tremer/410,411,412 po:verbo is:intransitiva VOLG i al:trémer
volver/310,311,312,410,411,412,510,511,512 po:verbo is:transitiva / intransitiva / pronominal / auxiliar VOLG i t pr al:vólver
